Utah statutes.
78B-5-205.   Judgment by confession authorized.
A judgment by confession may be entered without action, either for money due
or to become due or to secure any person against contingent liability on
behalf of the defendant, or both, in the manner prescribed by law. The
judgment may be entered in any court having jurisdiction for like amounts.
